Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 13.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-305
Commissioner
of Education; office; powers; duties.

The Commissioner
of Education as the executive officer of the State Board of Education shall:
(1) Have an office in the city of Lincoln in which shall be housed the records
of the State Board of Education and the State Department of Education, which
records shall be subject at all times to examination by the Governor, the
Auditor of Public Accounts, and committees of the Legislature; (2) keep the
board currently informed and advised on the operation and status of all aspects
of the educational program of the state under its jurisdiction; (3) prepare
a budget for financing the activities of the board and the department, including
the internal operation and maintenance of the department, and upon approval
by the board administer the same in accordance with appropriations by the
Legislature; (4) voucher the expenses of the department according to the rules
and regulations prescribed by the board; (5) be responsible for promoting
the efficiency, welfare, and improvement in the school system in the state
and for recommending to the board such policies, standards, rules, and regulations
as may be necessary to attain these purposes; (6) promote educational improvement
by (a) outlining and carrying out plans and conducting essential activities
for the preparation of curriculum and other materials, (b) providing necessary
supervisory and consultative services, (c) holding conferences of professional
educators and other civic leaders, (d) conducting research, experimentation,
and evaluation of school programs and activities, and (e) in other ways assisting
in the development of effective education in the state; (7) issue teachers' certificates
according to the provisions of law and the rules and regulations prescribed
by the board; and (8) attend or, in case of
necessity, designate a representative to attend all meetings of the board
except when the order of business of the board is the selection of a Commissioner
of Education. None of the duties prescribed in this section or in section
79-306 prevent the commissioner from exercising such other duties as in his
or her judgment and with the approval of the board are necessary to the proper
and legal exercise of his or her obligations.

Laws 1953, c. 320, § 12, p. 1059;

Laws 1979, LB 289, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-332;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 133;

Laws 2009, LB549, § 13.

Constitutional provisions:

Appointment, see Article VII, section 4, Constitution of Nebraska.

Board of Trustees of the Nebraska State Colleges, ex officio member, see Article VII, section 13, Constitution of Nebraska.

State Board of Vocational Education, executive officer, see section 79-740.